Nevada, session 83, AB538.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 231.033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.033 1. There is hereby created the Board of Economic
Development, consisting of:
(a) The following voting members:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The Lieutenant Governor;
(3) The Secretary of State; and
(4) Six members who must be selected from the private
sector and appointed as follows:
(I) Three members appointed by the Governor;
(II) One member appointed by the Speaker of the
Assembly;
(III) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of
the Senate; and
(IV) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of
the Assembly or the Minority Leader of the Senate. The Minority
Leader of the Senate shall appoint the member for the initial term,
the Minority Leader of the Assembly shall appoint the member for
the next succeeding term, and thereafter, the authority to appoint the
-
*AB538*

– 3 –
member for each subsequent term alternates between the Minority
Leader of the Assembly and the Minority Leader of the Senate.
(b) The following nonvoting members:
(1) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher
Education or his or her designee;
(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee;
(3) The Director of the Department of Business and Industry;
and
(4) The Director of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation.
2. In appointing the members of the Board described in
subsection 1, the appointing authorities shall coordinate the
appointments when practicable so that the members of the Board
represent the diversity of this State, including, without limitation,
different strategically important industries, different geographic
regions of this State and different professions.
3. The Governor shall serve as the Chair of the Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
members of the Board appointed pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 are appointed for terms of 4 years. The
initial members of the Board shall by lot select three of the initial
members of the Board appointed pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to serve an initial term of 2 years.
5. The Governor, the Lieutenant Governor or the Secretary of
State may designate a person to serve as a member of the Board for
the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or Secretary of State,
respectively. Any person designated to serve pursuant to this
subsection shall serve for the term of the officer appointing him or
her and serves at the pleasure of that officer. If the Governor
designates a person to serve on his or her behalf, that person shall
serve as the Chair of the Board. Vacancies in the appointed
positions on the Board must be filled by the appointing authority for
the unexpired term.
6. The Executive Director shall serve as the nonvoting
Secretary of the Board.
7. A majority of the voting members of the Board constitutes a
quorum, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Board is required to exercise any power conferred
on the Board.
8. The Board shall meet at least once each quarter but may
meet more often at the call of the Chair or a majority of the voting
members of the Board [.] , not including any temporary voting
members.
-
*AB538*

– 4 –
9. The members of the Board serve without compensation but
are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally while engaged
in the official business of the Board.
10. Not later than 15 days before any meeting at which the
Board will take action on an application for a tax abatement,
partial tax abatement or transferable tax credits for a business or
project that is or will be located in a county whose population is
less than 100,000, each entity to which notification is required to
be provided pursuant to NRS 231.0695 shall appoint a
representative to serve as a temporary voting member of the Board
for the sole purpose of considering and taking action on the
application. An entity to which notification is required to be
provided pursuant to NRS 231.0695 may appoint himself or
herself, if the entity is a natural person, or one of its members, if
the entity is a governing body. If, within the time required by this
subsection, the entity has not made an appointment of a temporary
voting member of the Board, the Office may take action on the
application without the appointment of such a temporary voting
member and the failure to make such an appointment must not be
considered for the purposes of determining the presence of a
quorum or the number of votes necessary to act on the application.
A temporary voting member appointed to the Board pursuant to
this subsection:
(a) May not vote on or participate in the consideration of any
matter before the Board other than the application for which the
temporary voting member was appointed.
(b) Serves without compensation from the Board and is not
entitled to per diem and travel allowances for engaging in any
business of the Board, other than any per diem and travel
allowances authorized and paid by the entity making the
appointment.
(c) Is not a member of the Board for the purposes of
determining the existence of a quorum pursuant to this section or
chapter 241 of NRS.
(d) May receive and view any information contained in the
application which is available to the members of the Board who
are not temporary voting members.
Sec. 2. NRS 231.069 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.069 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and
NRS 231.033, 239.0115, 360.890 and 360.950, the Office shall keep
confidential any record or other document of a client which is in its
possession if the client:
(a) Submits a request in writing that the record or other
document be kept confidential by the Office; and
-
*AB538*

– 5 –
(b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Office that the record
or other document contains proprietary or confidential information.
2. If the Office determines that a record or other document of a
client contains proprietary or confidential information, the
Executive Director shall attach to the file containing the record or
document:
(a) A certificate signed by him or her stating that a request for
confidentiality was made by the client and the date of the request;
(b) A copy of the written request submitted by the client;
(c) The documentation to support the request which was
submitted by the client; and
(d) A copy of the decision of the Office determining that the
record or other document contains proprietary or confidential
information.
3. The Office may share the records and other documents that
are confidential pursuant to this section with the nonprofit
corporation formed by the Executive Director pursuant to NRS
231.0545, as deemed necessary by the Office to accomplish the
purposes for which the nonprofit corporation was formed.
4. Records and documents that are confidential pursuant to this
section:
(a) Are proprietary or confidential information of the business;
(b) Are not a public record; and
(c) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office unless the business consents to the
disclosure.
5. As used in this section, “proprietary or confidential
information” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 360.247.
Sec. 3. NRS 231.0695 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.0695 1. For the purpose of any tax abatement, partial tax
abatement or transferable tax credits which the Office is required
or authorized to approve, the Office shall be deemed to have
approved the tax abatement, partial tax abatement [:] or
transferable tax credits:
(a) Upon approval by the Board for tax abatements, partial tax
abatements , transferable tax credits or any combination of tax
abatements, partial tax abatements and transferable tax credits
with a projected value to a single entity or, with respect to NRS
360.880 to 360.980, inclusive, a single project of $500,000 or more;
or
(b) Upon approval by the Executive Director for tax
abatements, partial tax abatements , transferable tax credits or any
combination of tax abatements, partial tax abatements and
transferable tax credits with a projected value to a single entity or,
-
*AB538*

– 6 –
with respect to NRS 360.880 to 360.980, inclusive, a single project
of less than $500,000.
2. If the Office receives an application for a tax abatement, a
partial tax abatement or transferable tax credits for a business or
project that is or will be located in a county whose population is
less than 100,000 and to which paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
this section or subsection 5 of NRS 231.1555 applies, the Office
shall, not later than 15 days after receiving the application, notify:
(a) The governing body of:
(1) Each county in which the business or project is or will
be located;
(2) Each city in which the business or project is or will be
located; and
(3) Each school district in which the business or project is
or will be located; and
(b) The president of each community college located in the
county in which the business or project is or will be located.
3. For the purposes of this section, “projected value” means the
dollar value of the abatement or tax credits requested by an entity or
on behalf of a project plus the accumulated value of all tax
abatements and tax credits received by that entity or project for the
immediately preceding 2 years.
Sec. 4. NRS 231.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1555 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fee imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. After considering any advice and recommendations of the
Board, the Executive Director shall establish:
(a) Procedures for applying to the Office for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits which must:
(1) Include, without limitation, a requirement that the
applicant set forth in the application:
(I) The proposed use of the transferable tax credits;
(II) The plans, projects and programs for which the
transferable tax credits will be used;
(III) The expected benefits of the issuance of the
transferable tax credits; and
(IV) A statement of the short-term and long-term impacts
of the issuance of the transferable tax credits; and
-
*AB538*

– 7 –
(2) Allow the applicant to revise the application upon the
recommendation of the Executive Director.
(b) The criteria which a person to whom a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits has been issued must satisfy to
be issued a certificate of transferable tax credits.
3. After receipt of an application pursuant to this section, the
Executive Director shall review and evaluate the application and
determine whether the approval of the application would promote
the economic development of this State and aid the implementation
of the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
4. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount of $100,000 or less, the Executive Director may approve the
application, subject to the provisions of subsection 6, if the
Executive Director determines that approving the application will
promote the economic development of this State and aid the
implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development.
5. If the applicant is requesting transferable tax credits in an
amount greater than $100,000, the Executive Director shall submit
the application and the Executive Director’s review and evaluation
of the application pursuant to subsection 3 to the Board, and the
Board may approve the application, subject to the provisions of
subsection 6 [,] of this section and subsection 10 of NRS 231.033,
if the Board determines that approving the application will promote
the economic development of this State and aid the implementation
of the State Plan for Economic Development.
6. The Executive Director or the Board shall not approve any
application for transferable tax credits for:
(a) A period of more than 5 fiscal years;
(b) Fiscal Year 2015-2016; or
(c) Any fiscal year if the approval of the application would
cause the total amount of transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
this section to exceed:
(1) For Fiscal Year 2016-2017, $1,000,000.
(2) For Fiscal Year 2017-2018, $2,000,000.
(3) For Fiscal Year 2018-2019, $2,000,000.
(4) For Fiscal Year 2019-2020, $3,000,000.
(5) For a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2020,
$5,000,000.
7. If the Executive Director or the Board approves an
application and issues a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the
tax credits available pursuant to this section to:
(a) The applicant;
-
*AB538*

– 8 –
(b) The Department of Taxation; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
8. Within 14 days after the Office determines that a person to
whom a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits has been
issued satisfies the criteria established by the Executive Director
pursuant to subsection 2, the Office shall notify the person that
transferable tax credits will be issued. Within 30 days after the
receipt of the notice, the person shall make an irrevocable
declaration of the amount of transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of
subsection 1, thereby accounting for all of the credits which will be
issued. Upon receipt of the declaration, the Office shall issue to the
person a certificate of transferable tax credits in the amount
approved by the Executive Director or the Board, as applicable, for
the fees or taxes included in the declaration. The Office shall notify
the Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board
of all transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, and the
amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
Sec. 5. NRS 360.890 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.890 1. If the Office of Economic Development receives
an application pursuant to NRS 360.889, the Office:
(a) Shall not consider the application unless the Office has
requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for a partial
abatement from any county, school district, city or town which the
Office determines may experience a direct economic effect as a
result of the partial abatement.
(b) Shall not take any action on the application unless the Office
takes that action at a public meeting conducted for that purpose.
(c) Shall, at least 30 days before any public meeting conducted
for the purpose of taking any action on the application, provide
notice of the application and the date, time and location of the public
meeting at which the Office will consider the application to:
(1) Each participant in the project;
(2) The Department;
(3) The Nevada Gaming Control Board;
(4) The governing body of the county, the board of trustees
of the school district and the governing body of the city or town, if
any, in which the project will be located;
(5) The governing body of any other political subdivision
that the Office determines could experience a direct economic effect
as a result of the abatement; and
(6) The general public.
2. The date of the public meeting to consider an application
submitted pursuant to NRS 360.889 must be not later than 60 days
-
*AB538*

– 9 –
after the date on which the Office receives the completed
application.
3. The Office shall approve an application submitted pursuant
to NRS 360.889 if the Office finds that the project is a qualified
project. The Office shall issue a decision on the application not later
than 30 days after the conclusion of the public meeting on the
application. Not later than 30 days after the Office issues a decision
approving an application submitted pursuant to NRS 360.889 in
which the lead participant applies for a certificate of eligibility for
the transferable tax credits described in paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 360.889, the Office must submit a written request to the
Interim Finance Committee for approval of the issuance of the
transferable tax credits.
4. The lead participant in a qualified project shall submit all
accountings and other required information to the Office and the
Department not later than 30 days after a date specified in the
decision issued by the Office. If the Office or the Department
determines that information submitted pursuant to this subsection is
incomplete, the lead participant shall, not later than 30 days after
receiving notice that the information is incomplete, provide to the
Office or the Department, as applicable, all additional information
required by the Office or the Department.
5. Until the Office of Economic Development provides notice
of the application and the public meeting pursuant to paragraph (c)
of subsection 1, the information contained in the application
provided to the Office of Economic Development:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record; and
(c) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the lead
participant consents to the disclosure.
6. After the Office provides notice of the application and the
public meeting pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1:
(a) The application is a public record; and
(b) Upon request by any person, the Executive Director of the
Office shall disclose the application to the person who made the
request, except for any information in the application that is
protected from disclosure pursuant to subsection 7.
7. Before the Executive Director of the Office discloses the
application to the public, the lead participant may submit a request
to the Executive Director of the Office to protect from disclosure
any information in the application which, under generally accepted
business practices, would be considered a trade secret or other
confidential proprietary information of the business. After
consulting with the business, the Executive Director of the Office
-
*AB538*

– 10 –
shall determine whether to protect the information from disclosure.
The decision of the Executive Director of the Office is final and is
not subject to judicial review. If the Executive Director of the Office
determines to protect the information from disclosure, the protected
information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Executive Director of the Office
from any copy of the application that is disclosed to the public; and
(d) [Must] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.033, must
not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or employee of
the Office of Economic Development unless the lead participant
consents to the disclosure.
Sec. 6. NRS 360.950 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.950 1. If the Office of Economic Development receives
an application pursuant to NRS 360.945, the Office:
(a) Shall not consider the application unless the Office has
requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for an
abatement from any county, school district, city or town which the
Office determines may experience a direct economic effect as a
result of the abatement.
(b) Shall not take any action on the application unless the Office
takes that action at a public meeting conducted for that purpose.
(c) Shall, at least 30 days before any public meeting conducted
for the purpose of taking any action on the application, provide
notice of the application and the date, time and location of the public
meeting at which the Office will consider the application to:
(1) Each participant in the project;
(2) The Department;
(3) The Nevada Gaming Control Board;
(4) The governing body of the county, the board of trustees
of the school district and the governing body of the city or town, if
any, in which the project will be located;
(5) The governing body of any other political subdivision
that the Office determines could experience a direct economic effect
as a result of the abatement; and
(6) The general public.
2. The date of the public meeting to consider an application
submitted pursuant to NRS 360.945 must be not later than 60 days
after the date on which the Office receives the completed
application.
3. The Office shall approve an application submitted pursuant
to NRS 360.945 if the Office finds that the project is a qualified
project. The Office shall issue a decision on the application not later
-
*AB538*

– 11 –
than 30 days after the conclusion of the public meeting on the
application.
4. The lead participant in a qualified project shall submit all
accountings and other required information to the Office and the
Department not later than 30 days after a date specified in the
decision issued by the Office. If the Office or the Department
determines that information submitted pursuant to this subsection is
incomplete, the lead participant shall, not later than 30 days after
receiving notice that the information is incomplete, provide to the
Office or the Department, as applicable, all additional information
required by the Office or the Department.
5. Until the Office of Economic Development provides notice
of the application and the public meeting pursuant to paragraph (c)
of subsection 1, the information contained in the application
provided to the Office of Economic Development:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record; and
(c) [Must] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.033, must
not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or employee of
the Office of Economic Development unless the lead participant
consents to the disclosure.
6. After the Office provides notice of the application and the
public meeting pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1:
(a) The application is a public record; and
(b) Upon request by any person, the Executive Director of the
Office shall disclose the application to the person who made the
request, except for any information in the application that is
protected from disclosure pursuant to subsection 7.
7. Before the Executive Director of the Office discloses the
application to the public, the lead participant may submit a request
to the Executive Director of the Office to protect from disclosure
any information in the application which, under generally accepted
business practices, would be considered a trade secret or other
confidential proprietary information of the business. After
consulting with the business, the Executive Director of the Office
shall determine whether to protect the information from disclosure.
The decision of the Executive Director of the Office is final and is
not subject to judicial review. If the Executive Director of the Office
determines to protect the information from disclosure, the protected
information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Executive Director of the Office
from any copy of the application that is disclosed to the public; and
-
*AB538*

– 12 –
(d) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the lead
participant consents to the disclosure.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB538*